lexc/misc/enhuvbpfx.lexc
!!!enhuvbpfx.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Vbpfx[gcat]

      
LEXICON Root
Vbpfx;


LEXICON Vbpfx
abba AddVbpfx;
agyon AddVbpfx;
alá AddVbpfx;
által AddVbpfx;
alul AddVbpfx;
át AddVbpfx;
be AddVbpfx;
bele AddVbpfx;
benn AddVbpfx;
egybe AddVbpfx;
el AddVbpfx;
ellen AddVbpfx;
elő AddVbpfx;
előre AddVbpfx;
észre AddVbpfx;
fel AddVbpfx;
félbe AddVbpfx;
félre AddVbpfx;
felül AddVbpfx;
fenn AddVbpfx;
föl AddVbpfx;
fölül AddVbpfx;
fönn AddVbpfx;
hátra AddVbpfx;
haza AddVbpfx;
helyre AddVbpfx;
hozzá AddVbpfx;
ide AddVbpfx;
jóvá AddVbpfx;
keresztül AddVbpfx;
ketté AddVbpfx;
ki AddVbpfx;
kölcsön AddVbpfx;
körbe AddVbpfx;
körül AddVbpfx;
közbe AddVbpfx;
közre AddVbpfx;
külön AddVbpfx;
le AddVbpfx;
meg AddVbpfx;
mellé AddVbpfx;
neki AddVbpfx;
oda AddVbpfx;
össze AddVbpfx;
rá AddVbpfx;
rajta AddVbpfx;
széjjel AddVbpfx;
szembe AddVbpfx;
szerte AddVbpfx;
szét AddVbpfx;
tele AddVbpfx;
tova AddVbpfx;
tovább AddVbpfx;
tönkre AddVbpfx;
túl AddVbpfx;
újjá AddVbpfx;
újra AddVbpfx;
utána AddVbpfx;
végbe AddVbpfx;
végig AddVbpfx;
vissza AddVbpfx;

LEXICON AddVbpfx
[stem]+Vbpfx[gcat]:0     #;
